Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-4,107
Bullfrogs; fishing permit required;
manner of taking.

Bullfrogs may be taken, possessed, transported,
and used under rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission
or commission orders setting forth seasons, bag limits, open areas,
and manner of taking established by the commission pursuant to section 37-314, by the holder of
a fishing permit. In taking bullfrogs, an artificial light may be used.

Laws 1957, c. 139, § 8, p. 468;

Laws 1973, LB 331, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-226;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 217;

Laws 2013, LB499, § 10.